Hawaii statutes.
[§480F-2] Posting and notice of fees
charged. Any person who cashes one or more checks for a fee shall:

(1) Post in a conspicuous place in every location at
which the person does business a notice that sets forth:

(A) The fees charged for cashing a check, for
selling or issuing a money order, and for the initial issuance of any
membership or identification cards; and

(B) That consumer complaints about the check
cashing business may be filed with the department of commerce and consumer
affairs, and includes and identifies the telephone number of the consumer
information service of the department of commerce and consumer affairs;

(2) Provide written notice to each customer of the
fees charged for cashing checks that is separate from and in addition to any
posted notice;

(3) Obtain a written acknowledgment from the customer
that written notice of the fees charged for cashing checks was provided; and

(4) Provide each customer a receipt documenting any
and all fees charged. [L 1999, c 146, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next